Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1139.
do enact as follows:SB1139,11Section 1. 16.754 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 16.754 (2) (a) and 2amended to read:SB1139,2,7316.754 (2) (a) Notwithstanding s. 16.75 (1) (a) 2., (2), (2m), and (6), when all 4other factors are substantially equal making purchases, the state shall purchase 5materials which that are manufactured to the greatest extent in the United States, 6as defined by the department by rule, unless prohibited by federal law or a treaty or 7other international agreement.SB1139,28Section 2. 16.754 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB1139,2,13916.754 (2) (b) Each contract entered into by the state for the construction, 10repair, or modification of a public works or public improvement project shall contain 11a provision requiring the contractor to use materials that are manufactured in the 12United States in the performance of the contract, unless prohibited by federal law 13or a treaty or other international agreement.SB1139,31Section 3. 16.754 (3) (intro.) and (a) of the statutes are amended to read:SB1139,3,11216.754 (3) Exemptions. (intro.) Subsection (2) (a) does not apply if the 3materials are purchased for the purpose of commercial resale or for the purpose of 4use in the production of goods for commercial sale. Subsection (2) (a) does not apply 5to the purchase of stationery and printing materials. Subsection (2) does not apply 6if the department determines, under s. 16.75 (1) (a) 2., that the foreign nation or 7subdivision thereof in which the vendor is domiciled does not give preference to 8vendors domiciled in that nation or subdivision in making governmental purchases. 9Subsection (2) (a) does not apply if the department or other person having 10contracting authority in respect to the purchase determines that any of the 11following:SB1139,3,1312(a) The materials are not manufactured in the United States in sufficient or 13reasonably available quantities; or.SB1139,414Section 4. 66.0901 (1m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1139,3,181566.0901 (1m) (b) Except when necessary to secure federal aid, and except as 16provided in sub. (10), a political subdivision may not use a bidding method that 17gives preference based on the geographic location of the bidder or that uses criteria 18other than the lowest responsible bidder in awarding a contract.SB1139,519Section 5. 66.0901 (10) of the statutes is created to read:SB1139,4,22066.0901 (10) Materials manufactured in the United States. Each public 21contract entered into by a municipality shall contain a provision that the contractor 22will use materials that are manufactured in the United States in the performance 1of the contract, unless prohibited by federal law or a treaty or other international 2agreement.SB1139,4,33